North Carolina, session 2025, HB1103.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-601 and Section 3K.1(c) of S.L.
2024-57, the Chatham County Board of Commissioners may implement and enforce all of the
following:
(1) The unified development ordinance adopted by the Chatham County Board of
Commissioners on November 18, 2024.
(2) A zoning map developed to accompany the unified development ordinance to
be adopted by the Chatham County Board of Commissioners before June 1,
2027.
SECTION 1.(b) The unified development ordinance and accompanying zoning map
shall be effective when approved by the Chatham County Board of Commissioners. The Board
of Commissioners shall give such approval on or before June 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1103-v-1*